District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

10-1007

Notice and contract summary to the Council on certain contracts

Repealed.

History

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 1806b
as added Mar. 16, 2005, D.C. Law 15-238, § 2(b), 51 DCR 10599
Mar. 11, 2010, D.C. Law 18-115, § 3(b), 57 DCR 886
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 1032(a), 58 DCR 6226

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 1012(a) of Fiscal Year 2012 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-93, June 29, 2011, 58 DCR 5599).